Maryland, session 2026, SB0442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1602.
(a) In this section, “assessment district” means a tax assessment district:
(1) established by the county; and
(2) shown on the official map adopted by the County Council titled “Tax
Assessment Districts, 2005”.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the Board may issue a Class A
(off–sale), Class B (off–sale), or Class D (off–sale) license based on its determination of
whether the license is necessary to accommodate the public.
– 1 –

Ch. 859 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) If the application is for a Class A (off–sale) or Class D (off–sale) license, the
Board may not issue the license if:
(1) the establishment for which the license would be issued is located in an
assessment district in which the ratio of off–sale licenses per individual exceeds one for
every 3,500 individuals; or
(2) the issuance of the license would cause the ratio of off–sale licenses per
individual in an assessment district to exceed one for every 3,500 individuals.
(d) Subsection (c) of this section does not apply:
(1) to the transfer or renewal of a license that was issued on or before July
1, 2025;
(2) in the 6th tax assessment district; [or]
(3) to an application for an on–site consumption permit under § 2–207 of
this article by an applicant that holds a Class 5 brewery license; OR
(4) TO AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE FILED ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2023, AND APPROVED BY THE BOARD BEFORE JULY 1, 2025.
(e) The population of each assessment district is to be determined by:
(1) the latest federal census; or
(2) estimates prepared by the Anne Arundel County Office of Planning and
Zoning.
(f) The Board may not approve the transfer of a Class A (off–sale) license or Class
D (off–sale) license:
(1) to a location outside the assessment district in which the license was
located on July 1, 2025; or
(2) if the license was not in existence as of July 1, 2025, to a location outside
the assessment district in which the license was originally issued.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective until the taking effect of the termination provision
specified in Section 2 of Chapters 818 and 819 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025.
If that termination provision takes effect, this Act shall be abrogated and of no further force
and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that termination provision.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –